Utah statutes.
78B-6-703.   Defect or defective condition making product unreasonably
dangerous -- Rebuttable presumption.
(1)  In any action for damages for personal injury, death, or property damage
allegedly caused by a defect in a product, a product may not be considered to
have a defect or to be in a defective condition, unless at the time the
product was sold by the manufacturer or other initial seller, there was a
defect or defective condition in the product which made the product
unreasonably dangerous to the user or consumer.
(2)  There is a rebuttable presumption that a product is free from any defect
or defective condition where the alleged defect in the plans or designs for
the product or the methods and techniques of manufacturing, inspecting and
testing the product were in conformity with government standards established
for that industry which were in existence at the time the plans or designs for
the product or the methods and techniques of manufacturing, inspecting and
testing the product were adopted.
